Connecticut, session 2026, HB05131.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
personal income tax deduction of up to ten thousand dollars for the
amount of principal and interest paid by a taxpayer for a taxable year
on a postsecondary education loan.